Tennessee, session 114, HB2503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-1013(f)(1), is amended by
deleting "ten (10) business days" and substituting "nine (9) business days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2503
012308
- 1 -